Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.188.086

Mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program—Selection standards.

The coordinator shall develop standards and criteria for selecting students who participate in the program which may include predictive instruments to ascertain aptitude and probability of success. The standards shall include requirements that students take certain courses, maintain a certain grade point average, and participate in activities sponsored by the program. Women and students from minority groups, which are traditionally underrepresented in mathematics and science-related professions and which meet the requirements established by the coordinator shall be selected.

[ 1984 c 265 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.625.230, 28A.03.436.]

NOTES:

Implementation—Funding required—1984 c 265: See note following RCW 28A.188.080.